District of Columbia statutes.
6-207

Office of Audit and Compliance.

The Authority shall establish an Office of Audit and Compliance. The Office of Audit and Compliance shall conduct independent fiscal and management audits of the Authority’s operations; other special audits, examinations, or other assignments; and civil and criminal investigations. The Office of Audit and Compliance shall comply with all federal requirements with respect to audits and investigations of federal programs and shall be the Authority’s liaison for the General Accounting Office and the Office of the Inspector General of HUD.

History

May 9, 2000, D.C. Law 13-105, § 8, 47 DCR 1325

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90-day) addition of section, see notes following § 6-201.